Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5139.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
TITLE
An act to provide for the levy, assessment, and collection of
a specific excise tax on the storage, use, or consumption in this
state of tangible personal property and certain services; to
appropriate the proceeds of that tax; to prescribe penalties; to
require certain information to be provided; and to make
appropriations.
ERE H04187'25 (H-2) ome7uf


Sec. 5. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or
subsection (5), a person subject to the tax under this act shall
register with the department and give the name and address of each
agent operating in this state, the location of all distribution or
sales houses or offices or other places of business in this state,
and any other information that the department requires relevant to
the enforcement of this act. However, a seller holding a sales tax
license obtained under the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL
205.51 to 205.78, is not required to separately register with the
department under this act. Every person subject to the tax under
this act shall source sales in accordance with section 20 and
collect the tax imposed by this act from the consumer.
(2) The corporation, corporations, securities, and land
development commercial licensing bureau of the department of labor
and economic growth licensing and regulatory affairs shall not
issue to any foreign corporation subject to the tax under this act
a certificate of authority to do business in this state or approve
and file the proposed articles of incorporation submitted to it by
any domestic corporation authorizing or permitting that corporation
to conduct any business subject to the tax under this act unless
the corporation submits with the application for the certificate of
authority or proposed articles of incorporation an application for
registration of the corporation under this act or an application
for a sales tax license under the general sales tax act, 1933 PA
167, MCL 205.51 to 205.78. The corporations, securities, and
commercial licensing bureau shall transmit the application shall be
transmitted to the department. by the corporation, securities, and
land development bureau.
(3) A domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized
ERE H04187'25 (H-2) ome7uf


to transact business in this state that submits a certificate of
dissolution or requests a certificate of withdrawal from this state
shall request a certificate from the department stating that taxes
are not due under section 27a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.27a, not more
than 60 days after submitting the certificate of dissolution or
requesting the certificate of withdrawal. A corporation that does
not request a certificate stating that taxes are not due is subject
to the same penalties under section 24 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.24,
that a taxpayer would be subject to for failure to file a return.
(4) A lessor may elect to pay use tax on receipts from the
rental or lease of the tangible personal property in lieu of
payment of sales or use tax on the full cost of the property at the
time it is acquired. For tax years that begin after December 31,
2001, in order to make a valid election under this subsection, a
lessor of tangible personal property that is an aircraft shall
obtain a use tax registration by the earlier of the date set for
the first payment of use tax under the lease or rental agreement or
90 days after the lessor first brings the aircraft into this state.
(5) A seller registered under the streamlined sales and use
tax agreement who that is not otherwise subject to the tax under
this act is not required to register under this section because of
the registration under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
Sec. 5c. (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this
act, a marketplace facilitator that has nexus in this state shall
collect and remit the tax due under this act on all taxable sales
made by the marketplace facilitator or facilitated for marketplace
sellers to a purchaser in this state regardless of whether the
marketplace seller for whom sales are facilitated has nexus with
this state.
ERE H04187'25 (H-2) ome7uf


(2) A marketplace facilitator is a person liable for the tax
imposed under this act, regardless of whether the marketplace
facilitator makes only facilitated sales for marketplace sellers or
a combination of direct and facilitated sales and has all the
rights and duties of a taxpayer under this act.
(3) A marketplace facilitator shall report its direct sales
and the sales it facilitates to purchasers in this state in a
manner as prescribed by the department.
(4) A class action shall not be brought against a marketplace
facilitator in any court of this state on behalf of purchasers
arising from or in any way related to an overpayment of use tax
collected and remitted on sales facilitated by the marketplace
facilitator, regardless of whether that claim is characterized as a
tax refund claim. Nothing in this subsection affects a purchaser's
right to seek a refund as provided under section 14b.
(5) Nothing in this section affects the obligation of a
purchaser to remit the tax imposed by this act for a taxable
transaction on which a marketplace facilitator or marketplace
seller does not remit sales or use tax.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a
marketplace facilitator is required to collect and remit tax under
subsection (1), the department shall audit only the marketplace
facilitator for sales made by marketplace sellers that were
facilitated by the marketplace facilitator. The department shall
not audit a marketplace seller for sales facilitated by a
marketplace facilitator required to collect and remit tax under
subsection (1) unless the marketplace seller fails to provide the
marketplace facilitator with sufficient information to the extent
that the marketplace facilitator is not liable under subsection
ERE H04187'25 (H-2) ome7uf


(7).
(7) A marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability under
this section for failure to collect and remit the correct amount of
tax to the extent that the marketplace facilitator demonstrates, to
the satisfaction of the department, that the failure was due to
incorrect or insufficient information given to the marketplace
facilitator by the marketplace seller. The relief under this
subsection does not apply if the marketplace seller is an affiliate
of the marketplace facilitator.
(8) A marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability under
this section if the marketplace facilitator demonstrates, to the
satisfaction of the department, that the tax levied under this act
on a sale facilitated by the marketplace facilitator was paid to
the department by the marketplace seller or provides a claim of
exemption provided by the marketplace seller's purchaser.
(9) A marketplace seller is not liable for the tax imposed by
this act on sales made through a marketplace facilitator required
to collect and remit tax under subsection (1) unless the
marketplace seller fails to provide the marketplace facilitator
with sufficient information to the extent that the marketplace
facilitator is not liable under subsection (7).
(10) This section applies regardless of whether the
marketplace facilitator has a physical presence in this state.
(11) As used in this section:
(a) "Affiliate" means an affiliated person as that term is
defined in section 5a.
(b) "Listed residential property" means a cabin, house,
trailer, vehicle, or structure, or portion thereof, that is used,
or designed to be used, as a residence or home of 1 or more
ERE H04187'25 (H-2) ome7uf


individuals. Listed residential property does not include a hotel
or motel, or portion thereof, regardless of whether 1 or more rooms
in the hotel or motel are individually owned.
(c) (b) "Marketplace facilitator" means a person that meets
the requirements of subparagraph (i), but does not include a person
described in subparagraph (ii), (iii), or (iv):
(i) A person is a marketplace facilitator if the person
facilitates a retail sale by a marketplace seller by listing or
advertising for sale by a marketplace seller in a marketplace,
tangible personal property or taxable services and either directly
or indirectly through agreements or arrangements with third parties
or its affiliates collecting payment from the customer and
transmitting that payment to the marketplace seller for
consideration.
(ii) Marketplace facilitator does not include a person who
operates a platform or forum that provides internet, print,
electronic, or any other form of advertising services, including
listing tangible personal property or services for sale, if the
person does not also engage directly or indirectly, through 1 or
more affiliates, in the activities described in subparagraph (i).
(iii) A person is not a marketplace facilitator with respect to
the sale of or charges for rooms, lodgings, or accommodations that
are described in section 3a if the rooms, lodgings, or
accommodations are provided by a hotelkeeper, motel operator, or
other person that is registered under section 5 or licensed under
section 3 of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.53.and
are not listed residential property.
(iv) A person is not a marketplace facilitator with respect to
the sale of telecommunications services as described in section 3a.
ERE H04187'25 (H-2) ome7uf


(d) (c) "Marketplace seller" means a person that makes retail
sales through a physical or electronic marketplace operated by a
marketplace facilitator.
Sec. 5d. (1) A marketplace facilitator that facilitates the
sale of listed residential properties in this state during a
covered period shall, not later than 30 days after the end of the
covered period, provide or make available to each marketplace
seller for whom sales are facilitated the amount of the gross sales
facilitated during the covered period by the marketplace
facilitator for each listed residential property of the marketplace
seller. The information described in this subsection may be
provided in any format.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Covered period" means a calendar year or, at the election
of the marketplace facilitator, a period less than a calendar year.
(b) "Listed residential property", "marketplace facilitator",
and "marketplace seller" mean those terms as defined in section 5c.
Final Page
ERE H04187'25 (H-2) ome7uf